Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FAMILY HOMELESS PREVENTION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency for the family homeless prevention and assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.204. new text end